Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1023.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11a. The commission shall have has jurisdiction over petitions or resolutions for annexation as provided in section 9 of Act No. 279 of the Public Acts of 1909, as amended.all of the following: (a) Section 9 of the home rule city act, 1909 PA 279, MCL 117.9. (b) Section 6b of chapter XIV of the general law village act, 1895 PA 3, MCL 74.6b. (c) Section 2b of the home rule village act, 1909 PA 278, MCL 78.2b. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 1024. (b)    Senate Bill No. 1025.